Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.468

Financial education standards—Availability of materials.

(1) After consulting with the financial education public-private partnership, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make available to all school districts a list of materials that align with the financial education standards integrated into the state learning standards pursuant to RCW 28A.300.460(2)(d).

(2) School districts shall provide all students in grades nine through twelve the opportunity to access the financial education standards, whether through a regularly scheduled class period; before or after school; during lunch periods; at library and study time; at home; via online learning opportunities; through career and technical education course equivalencies; or other opportunities. School districts shall publicize the availability of financial education opportunities to students and their families. School districts are encouraged to grant credit toward high school graduation to students who successfully complete financial education courses.

[ 2015 c 211 s 4.]